Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1706.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1426. Student Mental Health Awareness.--(a) The State Board of Education shall review the existing State standards for health, safety and physical education at 22 Pa. Code Ch. 4 (relating to academic standards and assessment) and revise the standards as necessary to address student mental health awareness.(b) The Department of Health and the Department of Education shall develop and post on their publicly accessible Internet <--12345678910111213141516171819 websites SECTION 1426. STUDENT MENTAL HEALTH AWARENESS.--(A) THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, SHALL DEVELOP AND POST ON ITS PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE, guidelines and other relevant materials to inform and educate students participating in or desiring to participate in an athletic activity , their parents or guardians and their coaches about the nature and warning signs of mental health distress, mental health illness and related issues. In developing the guidelines and materials, the Department of Health and the Department of Education EDUCATION, THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES may utilize existing materials developed by mental health organizations.(c) (B) A school entity shall notify its students, their parents or guardians, athletic staff COACHES and extracurricular advisors twice each school year of mental health services available within the school entity or the community in which the school entity is located AND COMMUNITY-BASED REFERRAL PARTNERS THAT CAN ASSIST IN IDENTIFYING COMMUNITY-BASED MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES and how students and their parents or guardians may access the services.(d) If a student is injured (C) IF A STUDENT IS HABITUALLY TRUANT AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1326, DEMONSTRATES AN OBSERVABLE CHANGE IN BEHAVIOR or suddenly stops attending a school- sponsored athletic or extracurricular activity WITHOUT EXPLANATION , the school entity of the student shall notify the school entity's REFER THE STUDENT TO THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S STUDENT assistance program, subject to the requirements of the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (Public Law 90-247, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g). Upon notification, the school entity's 20250HB1706PN2877 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 student assistance program shall, at a minimum, provide the student's parents or guardians with information on mental health services identified under subsection (c). The Department of Education may by rule establish the time period between the injury or nonattendance and the notification to the student assistance program under this section. REFERRAL BY THE STUDENT'S SCHOOL ENTITY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE MADE TO THE STUDENT ASSISTANCE PROGRAM WITHIN FOURTEEN (14) CALENDAR DAYS FROM THE DATE THE SCHOOL ENTITY IS AWARE OF THE HABITUAL TRUANCY, OBSERVABLE CHANGE IN BEHAVIOR OR SUDDEN NONATTENDANCE AT A SCHOOL-SPONSORED ATHLETIC OR EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITY WITHOUT EXPLANATION.(e) (D) Not later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of this section, the Pennsylvania Interscholastic Athletic Association shall review the existing coaching education requirements for coaches engaged at a member school and revise the required educational courses for training of coaches to include student mental health awareness beginning in the 2025- 2026 2027 -2028 school year. The training under this subsection: (1) Shall, at a minimum, incorporate the training standards adopted by the School Safety and Security Committee under section 1310-B(b). STANDARDS REQUIRED UNDER SECTION 1310-B(A) (1).(2) May be credited toward a professional educator's continuing professional education requirements under section 1205.2 and a school or system leader's continuing professional education requirement under section 1205.5.(f) (E) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20250HB1706PN2877 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "School entity" means a school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school."Student assistance program" means as defined in 22 Pa. Code § 12.16 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1706PN2877 - 4 - 123456